Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska20-323
Affirmative action required; cooperation with commission.

All executive departments, state agencies, and independent instrumentalities exercising essential public functions, including any state agency having regulatory or supervisory authority over financial institutions, shall administer their programs and activities relating to housing and urban development in a manner affirmatively to further the purposes of the Nebraska Fair Housing Act and shall cooperate with the commission to further such purposes.

Laws 1991, LB 825, § 24.